InternalSandhi.foma
Labial = p|ph|b|bh|m|v;
Dental = t|th|d|dh|n|s|l;
Retroflex = ṭ|ṭh|ḍ|ḍh|ṇ|ṣ|r;
Palatal = c|ch|j|jh|ñ|ś|y;
Velar = k|kh|g|gh|ṅ;
Stop = p|ph|b|bh|t|th|d|dh|ṭ|ṭh|ḍ|ḍh|c|ch|j|jh|k|kh|g|gh;
Fricative = s|ṣ|ś;
Obstruent = Stop | Fricative;
C = Labial|Dental|Retroflex|Palatal|Velar|H|ḥ;
ShortVowel = [a|i|u];
LongVowel = [ā|ī|ū|e|o];
V = ShortVowel|LongVowel;
FinalConsonants = C+ -> 0 || C _ .#.;
SBetweenCons = s -> 0 || Obstruent _ Obstruent;
SCerebralization = s -> ṣ || [k|r|[V - [a|ā]]](ṃ|ḥ) _ ~r;
Depalatalization = c -> k, j -> g || _ [s|t|th|dh|bh] | .#.;
Deaspiration = kh -> k, ṭh -> ṭ, th -> t, ph -> p || _ [s|t|th|dh];
Devoicing = g -> k, ḍ -> ṭ, d -> t, b -> p || _ [s|t|th|s] | .#.;
Voicing = k -> g, ṭ -> ḍ, t -> d, p -> b || _ d|bh;
VoicedAspiratesBeforeS = gh -> k, ḍh -> ṭ, dh -> t, bh -> p || _ s;
AccentMark = %/ -> "́";
InternalSandhi = FinalConsonants .o. SBetweenCons .o. Depalatalization .o. Deaspiration .o. Devoicing
.o. Voicing .o. VoicedAspiratesBeforeS .o. SCerebralization .o. AccentMark;
